District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.02b

Transfer of authorities and functions of the District of Columbia Sports and Entertainment Commission; abolishment of the District of Columbia Sports and Entertainment Commission.

(a)

(1)

All authorities and functions of the District of Columbia Sports and Entertainment Commission, established pursuant to Chapter 14 of Title 3 [§ 3-1401 et seq.], are transferred to the Authority, except that the maintenance and operation of the Robert F. Kennedy Memorial Stadium and the nonmilitary section of the Armory shall be transferred to the Department of General Services.

(2)

The Authority and the Department of General Services shall enter into a Memorandum of Agreement not later than 60 days before the beginning of each fiscal year that shall set forth the terms and conditions for the Department of General Services to maintain the Robert F. Kennedy Memorial Stadium and the nonmilitary portion of the Armory, including the level of service and the procedures and timing for reimbursement to the Department of General Services for its maintenance and upkeep services at the Robert F. Kennedy Memorial Stadium and the nonmilitary portion of the Armory.

(b)

The District of Columbia Sports and Entertainment Commission is abolished.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 202b
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2081(d), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 72(a), 59 DCR 6190
This section is referenced in § 10-1202.08c.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Department of General Services” for “Office of Property Management” throughout the section.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2081(d) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2081(d) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).